Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-607
Rules and regulations; adoption; procedure.

The commissioner shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the Employment Security Law pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act. This section shall not be construed to invalidate any rules or regulations in effect on September 6, 1985.

Laws 1937, c. 108, § 11, p. 390;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 48-711;

R.S.1943, § 48-607;

Laws 1985, LB 339, § 8.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.